Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2268
Medicaid waiver funds; use authorized.

Services identified by care plans for those eligible for medical assistance whose care needs are appropriate for nursing facilities but whose needs can be met outside a nursing facility may be purchased with medicaid waiver funds available through the home and community-based waiver for the aged and disabled administered by the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1993, LB 801, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 890;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 776.